Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.920

Repeal and saving.

Chapter 177, Laws of 1941, chapters 6 and 24, Laws of 1943, and chapter 88, Laws of 1949 are repealed: PROVIDED, That this section shall not affect the validity of any order, rule, regulation, contract, or agreement made or promulgated under authority of the repealed acts, which orders, rules, regulations, contracts, or agreements shall remain in force until they may be repealed, amended, or superseded by orders, rules, regulations, contracts, or agreements made or promulgated under this chapter: PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section shall not affect the tenure of any officer, employee, or person serving under authority of any repealed act and such officer, employee, or person shall continue in his or her position until such time as a successor is appointed or employed under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 801; 1951 c 178 s 17.]